New York, session 2025-2026, A4621.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 99-ss to read as follows: 3 § 99-ss. Under-grounding of electrical power or telecommunications 4 lines fund. 1. There is hereby established in the joint custody of the 5 state comptroller and the commissioner of taxation and finance a special 6 revenue fund to be known as the "under-grounding of electrical power or 7 telecommunications lines fund". 8 2. The fund shall consist of all monies appropriated for its purpose 9 included but not limited to any funds supplied by the Federal Emergency 10 Management Agency for disaster recovery and hazard mitigation which may 11 be used for state infrastructure repair. 12 3. Monies of the fund, when allocated, shall be disbursed to provide 13 for the purpose of moving overhead electrical power or telecommuni- 14 cations lines underground. Under the fund counties, towns and villages 15 may apply for reimbursement from the fund to contract with power and 16 telecommunications providers as provided in this section. Counties, 17 towns and villages may supply a two person crew and use of certain 18 project necessary equipment to power and telecommunications providers 19 for the purpose of moving overhead electrical power or telecommuni- 20 cations lines underground. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02610-01-5